Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-5501
Act, how cited.

Sections 19-5501 to 19-5506 shall be known and may be cited as the Municipal Density and Missing Middle Housing Act.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 1.